Utah statutes.
76-10-1219.   Qualification for distribution of films.
(1)  A distributor which is a corporation shall be qualified to distribute
films within this state if:
(a)  it is a domestic corporation in good standing or a foreign corporation
authorized to transact business in this state; and
(b)  it submits itself to the jurisdiction and laws of this state relating to
being a distributor in this state.
(2)  A distributor which is not a corporation shall be qualified to distribute
films within this state if:
(a)  it has and continuously maintains a registered office in this state; and
(b)  it has a registered agent whose business address is at that registered
office and which is either an individual residing and domiciled in this state,
a domestic corporation in good standing, or a foreign corporation authorized
to transact business in this state.
(3)  This section shall not affect the right to serve any process, notice, or
demand, required or permitted by law to be served upon a distributor, in any
other manner provided by law.
